en: Assortments of biscuits, Assortment of miniature sweets and biscuits, Assorted biscuits
fr: Assortiments de biscuits, Assortiment de petits biscuits secs

en: Gluten-free biscuits
bg: Бисквити без глутен
cs: Bezlepkové sušenky
de: Glutenfreie Kekse
es: Galletas sin gluten
fi: gluteenittomat keksit
fr: Biscuits sans gluten
hr: Bezglutenski keksi
hu: Gluténmentes kekszek
it: Biscotti senza glutine
lt: Sausainiai be glitimo
nl: Glutenvrije koekjes, Koekjes zonder gluten, Glutenvrij koekje
pl: Ciasteczka bezglutenowe
ro: Biscuiți fără gluten

en: Tartlet biscuits with chocolate, Biscuit (small tart) with chocolate pre-packed, Chocolate tartlets
de: Schokoladentörtchen
fr: Tartelettes au chocolat, tartelette au chocolat
hr: Tartlet keksi s čokoladom
it: Tortini di cioccolato
nl: Chocolade taartjes

en: Tartlet biscuits with fruit preparation, Biscuit with fruit covering, Small tart with fruit covering
de: Biscuit mit Fruchtüberzug, Keks mit Fruchtüberzug, Kleine Torte mit Fruchtüberzug
fr: Tartelettes à la préparation de fruits, Biscuit sec nappé aux fruits, Tartelette aux fruits
hr: Tartlet keksi s voćnim pripravkom
it: snack dolci con copertura a base di frutta

en: Plain wheat biscuits
fr: Biscuits au blé natures

en: Biscuits with meringue, Pastry biscuit with meringue
fr: Biscuits meringués, Biscuit pâtissier meringué

en: Buckweat biscuits
fr: Biscuits au sarrasin

en: Sprits biscuits, Sprits, spritz biscuits
de: Spritzgebäck
fr: Biscuits sprits, Sprits, biscuits spritz
hr: Špric keksi
nl: Spritsen, Sprits

en: Plain sprits biscuits
fr: Biscuits sprits natures

en: Chocolate sprits biscuits
fr: Biscuits sprits au chocolat

en: Drop cookies
xx: Cookies
ca: Cookies
da: Småkager
de: Cookies
es: Cookies
fi: Cookies
fr: Cookies
hr: Cookies
hu: Cookies
it: Cookie, cookies
ja: ドロップクッキー
nl: Cookies
ro: Cookies
ru: Печенье
sv: Småkakor
zh: 曲奇, 曲奇饼干

en: Chocolate chip cookies
de: Schokoladen-Cookies
es: Cookies con chocolate
fi: Suklaahippukeksit
fr: Cookies au chocolat
hr: Keksi sa cokoladnim komadima
it: Biscotti con gocce di cioccolato
ja: チョコチップクッキー
lt: Sausainiai su šokolado gabaliukais
nl: Cookies met chocoladestukjes
ro: Prăjituri cu ciocolată
zh: 巧克力曲奇, 巧克力曲奇饼干

en: Cookies with milk chocolate
de: Cookies mit Milchschokolade
es: Cookies con chocolate con leche
fi: Maitosuklaacookiet
fr: Cookies au chocolat au lait
hr: Keksovi s mliječnom čokoladom
it: Biscotti con cioccolato al latte
lt: Sausainiai su pieniško šokolado gabaliukais
nl: Melkchocoladekoekjes, Melkchocoladekoekje
ro: Prăjituri cu ciocolată cu lapte

en: Cookies with chocolate and coconut
de: Cookies mit Schokolade und Kokosnuss
fr: Cookies au chocolat et à la noix de coco
hr: Keksi s čokoladom i kokosom
lt: Sausainiai su šokolado gabaliukais ir kokosu
nl: Kokos-Chocoladekoekjes, Kokos-chocoladekoekje, Kokoschocoladekoekjes
ro: Biscuiți cu ciocolată și nucă de cocos

en: Cookies with chocolate and nougat, chocolate and nougat cookies
de: Cookies mit Nugat und Schokolade
fr: Cookies au chocolat et à la nougatine
hr: Keksi s čokoladom i nugatom
it: Biscotti con cioccolato e torrone
lt: Sausainiai su šokolado gabaliukais ir nuga
nl: Chocolade-nogakoekjes, Chocolade-nogakoekje

en: Chocolate and hazelnut cookies
de: Cookies und Haselnuss-Cookies
es: Cookies con chocolate y avellanas
fr: Cookies au chocolat et aux noisettes
hr: Keksi od čokolade i lješnjaka
it: Biscotti di nocciola e cioccolato
lt: Sausainiai su šokolado gabaliukais ir lazdyno riešutais
nl: Chocoladehazelnootkoekjes, Chocoladehazelnootkoekje
ro: Biscuiți cu ciocolată și alune

en: Raisin cookies
da: Småkager med rosiner
de: Cookies mit Rosinen
fr: Cookies au raisin
hr: Keksi s grožđicama
lt: Sausainiai su razinomis
nl: Rozijnenkoekjes, Rozijnenkoekje, Rozijnekoekjes, Rozijnekoekje
ro: Biscuiți cu stafide, Fursecuri cu stafide
sv: Småkakor med russin

en: Almond cookies, Thin biscuits with almonds
bg: Бадемови бисквити
de: Mandelkekse, Mandel-Cookie
fi: mantelikeksit
fr: Croquants aux amandes, Cookies aux amandes, Biscuits aux amandes, Biscuits secs aux amandes
hr: Keksi od badema
it: Biscotti alle mandorle
lt: Sausainiai su migdolais, Migdoliniai sausainiai
nl: Amandelkoekjes, Amandelkoekje
ro: Biscuiți cu migdale, Fursecuri cu migdale
zh: 杏仁饼干

en: Oatmeal biscuits, Oatmeal cookies
bg: Овесени бисквити
da: Havrekiks
de: Hafer-Cookies
es: Galletas de avena
fi: Kaurakeksit
fr: Biscuits à l'avoine
hr: Zobeni Keksi
it: Biscotti di fiocchi d'avena
ja: オートミールクッキー
lt: Avižiniai sausainiai
nl: Haverkoekjes, Haverkoekje
ru: Печенье овсяное, овсяное печенье
sv: Havrekex

en: Plain rolled oats biscuits
fr: Biscuits aux flocons d'avoine nature